Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 82 The Rhode Island Urban Education Act of 1998

16-82-1.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may referred to as the “Rhode Island Urban Education Act of 1998.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 475, § 1.

16-82-2.
Legislative intent and purpose.

The general assembly recognizes that certain school systems of urban communities as defined in this chapter require additional financial support and relief by the state, and allocates additional funding to these communities.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 475, § 1.

16-82-3.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, “urban communities” means those communities identified to receive targeted aid in §

16-7.1-16

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 475, § 1.

16-82-4.
Targeted school aid.

Locally or regionally operated school districts shall be eligible for targeted aid if they have a tax effort index below 1.0 as calculated pursuant to §

16-7.1-16

and a free and reduced lunch count in grades K-3 greater than forty percent (40%).

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 475, § 1.

16-82-5.
Calculation of targeted aid.

Districts shall be eligible for aid based on the proportion that their average daily membership bears to the total average daily membership of districts eligible for aid in accordance with §

16-7.1-16

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 475, § 1.

16-82-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 475, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 62, effective July 6, 2001.